Utah statutes.
78B-6-1234.   Referees' deed on confirmation -- Disposition of proceeds.

If the sale is confirmed by the court, an order shall be entered directing the referees to execute conveyances and authorizing them to take securities pursuant to sale.  The order may also give directions directing the disposition of the proceeds of the sale.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

